Utah statutes.
41-12a-506.   Application to persons without license or registration.
If the operator or the owner of a motor vehicle involved in an accident in
Utah has no license or registration in Utah, or is a nonresident, he may not
obtain a license or registration in Utah until he has complied with the
requirements of this chapter to the extent that would be necessary if, at the
time of the accident, he held a Utah license and registration.
